Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-641
Licensees; primary
enclosures; requirements.

The primary enclosures
of all licensees shall meet the following requirements:

(1) A primary
enclosure shall provide adequate space appropriate to the age, size, weight,
and breed of each dog or cat. For purposes of this subdivision, adequate space
means sufficient room to allow each dog or cat to turn around without touching
another animal, to stand, sit, and lie in a comfortable, normal position,
and to walk in a normal manner without the head of such animal touching the
top of the enclosure, which shall be at least six inches above the head of
the tallest animal when the animal is standing;

(2) A primary enclosure shall have solid surface flooring or a flooring material that
protects the dogs' and cats' feet and legs from injury and that, if of mesh
or slatted construction, do not allow the dogs' and cats' feet to pass through
any openings in the floor;

(3) If a primary enclosure
has a suspended floor constructed of metal strands, the strands shall either
be greater than one-eighth of an inch in diameter (nine gauge) or coated with
a material such as plastic or fiberglass; and

(4) The suspended floor of
any primary enclosure shall be strong enough so that the floor does not sag
or bend between the structural supports.

Laws 2003, LB 274, § 8;

Laws 2012, LB427, § 7.